Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202643-1410
Child support; decree or approved settlement; effect after death of parent.

Any judicially approved settlement or order of support made by a court having jurisdiction in the premises shall be binding on the legal representatives of the parent in the event of his or her death, to the same extent as other contractual obligations and judicial judgments or decrees.

Laws 1941, c. 81, § 10, p. 325;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 43-710;

R.S.1943, § 13-110;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 13-110;

Laws 2026, LB70, § 14.
July 18, 2026